Utah statutes.
70A-9a-208.   Additional duties of secured party having control of
collateral.
(1)  This section applies to cases in which there is no outstanding secured
obligation and the secured party is not committed to make advances, incur
obligations, or otherwise give value.
(2)  Within ten days after receiving an authenticated demand by the debtor:
(a)  a secured party having control of a deposit account under Subsection 70A-
9a-104(1)(b) shall send to the bank with which the deposit account is
maintained an authenticated statement that releases the bank from any further
obligation to comply with instructions originated by the secured party;
(b)  a secured party having control of a deposit account under Subsection 70A-
9a-104(1)(c) shall:
(i)  pay the debtor the balance on deposit in the deposit account; or
(ii)  transfer the balance on deposit into a deposit account in the debtor's
name;
(c)  a secured party, other than a buyer, having control of electronic chattel
paper under Section 70A-9a-105 shall:
(i)  communicate the authoritative copy of the electronic chattel paper to the
debtor or its designated custodian;
(ii)  if the debtor designates a custodian that is the designated custodian
with which the authoritative copy of the electronic chattel paper is
maintained for the secured party, communicate to the custodian an
authenticated record releasing the designated custodian from any further
obligation to comply with instructions originated by the secured party and
instructing the custodian to comply with instructions originated by the
debtor; and
(iii)  take appropriate action to enable the debtor or its designated
custodian to make copies of or revisions to the authoritative copy which add
or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy without the consent
of the secured party;
(d)  a secured party having control of investment property under Subsection
70A-8-105(4)(b) or 70A-9a-106(2) shall send to the securities intermediary or
commodity intermediary with which the security entitlement or commodity
contract is maintained an authenticated record that releases the securities
intermediary or commodity intermediary from any further obligation to comply
with entitlement orders or directions originated by the secured party;
(e)  a secured party having control of a letter-of-credit right under Section
70A-9a-107 shall send to each person having an unfulfilled obligation to pay
or deliver proceeds of the letter of credit to the secured party an
authenticated release from any further obligation to pay or deliver proceeds
of the letter of credit to the secured party; and
(f)  a secured party having control of an electronic document shall:
(i)  give control of the electronic document to the debtor or the debtor's
designated custodian;
(ii)  if the debtor designates a custodian that is the designated custodian
with which the authoritative copy of the electronic document is maintained for
the secured party, communicate to the custodian an authenticated record
releasing the designated custodian from any further obligation to comply with
instructions originated by the secured party and instructing the custodian to
comply with instructions originated by the debtor; and
(iii)  take appropriate action to enable to the debtor or its designated
custodian to make copies of or revisions to the authoritative copy without the
consent of the secured party.
